Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2618
Optometric assistants; authorized.

Any licensed optometrist may employ optometric assistants. Such assistants, under the supervision of a licensed optometrist, may perform such duties as are prescribed in accordance with rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the department, with the recommendation of the board.

Laws 2002, LB 1062, § 31;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,135.07;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 891.